apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="f/änken#_an__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änks</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änkt</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änkt</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änke</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éings</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éingt</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungs</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungt</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>änk</l>       <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änkt</l>      <r>änken<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/féieren__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>féiere</l>    <r>féieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geféiert</l>  <r>féieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/fëllen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>fëlle</l>     <r>fëllen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gefëllt</l>   <r>fëllen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>nn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>nn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äis</l>       <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äit</l>       <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éich</l>      <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éichs</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éich</l>      <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiche</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éicht</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éiche</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ouch</l>      <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouchs</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouch</l>      <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouche</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oucht</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ouche</l>     <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éi</l>        <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>inn<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/glidderen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>gliddere</l>  <r>glidderen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gegliddert</l><r>glidderen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/gräifen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>gräife</l>    <r>gräifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gegraff</l>   <r>gräifen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/géissen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>géisse</l>    <r>géissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gegoss</l>    <r>géissen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/leeën__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>leeë</l>      <r>leeën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>geluecht</l>  <r>leeën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ë</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ën<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afänken">         <i>f</i><par n="f/änken#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aféieren">        <i>a</i><par n="a/féieren__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afëllen">         <i>a</i><par n="a/fëllen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="agesinn">         <i>agesi</i><par n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="agesinn">         <i>ges</i><par n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aglidderen">      <i>a</i><par n="a/glidderen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="agräifen">        <i>a</i><par n="a/gräifen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="agéissen">        <i>a</i><par n="a/géissen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aleeën">          <i>a</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aleeën">          <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="anhänken">        <i>h</i><par n="f/änken#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ausgesinn">       <i>ausgesi</i><par n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ausgesinn">       <i>ges</i><par n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ausleeën">        <i>aus</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ausleeën">        <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="bäileeën">        <i>bäi</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="bäileeën">        <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="draleeën">        <i>dra</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="draleeën">        <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="dropleeën">       <i>drop</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="dropleeën">       <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="duerleeën">       <i>duer</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="duerleeën">       <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="eraleeën">        <i>era</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="eraleeën">        <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="erëmgesinn">      <i>erëmgesi</i><par n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="erëmgesinn">      <i>ges</i><par n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ofgesinn">        <i>ofgesi</i><par n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ofgesinn">        <i>ges</i><par n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="opféieren">       <i>op</i><par n="a/féieren__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ugesinn">         <i>ugesi</i><par n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ugesinn">         <i>ges</i><par n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="virgesinn">       <i>virgesi</i><par n="agesi/nn__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="virgesinn">       <i>ges</i><par n="ges/inn#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ëmleeën">         <i>ëm</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ëmleeën">         <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ënnerleeën">      <i>ënner</i><par n="a/leeën__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="ënnerleeën">      <i>lee</i><par n="lee/ën#_an__vblex_sep"/></e>
